Idaho, session 2025, H0216.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-250, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-250. COMPLETION, AND CORRECTION, AND AMENDMENT OF CERTIFICATES --
PROCEDURE -- OTHER ALTERATIONS PROHIBITED. (1) A certificate of any event
shall be completed, corrected, amended or otherwise altered after being
filed with the vital statistics unit only in accordance with this chapter and
rules promulgated by the board.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Amended" refers to a change in legal facts.
(b) "Completed" refers to the addition of a material fact to an area of a
certificate that was previously left blank.
(c) "Corrected" refers to the replacement of previously entered incor-
rect information with correct information following the receipt of au-
thoritative documentation of a material fact.
(d) "Legal facts" means facts that are not material facts as described
in section 39-245A(2), Idaho Code, and are the result of a legally bind-
ing decision or process.
(3) A certificate that is completed or corrected shall not be marked
"amended" and shall not contain markings identifying the specific comple-
tion or correction. A completed or corrected certificate shall be identi-
fied on the face of the certificate with a C1, C2, et seq., corresponding to
the number of completions or corrections, and the evidence submitted to doc-
ument the material fact that was completed or corrected shall be made part of
the record kept in the office of the registrar.
(1) (4) A certificate that is amended under the provisions of this sec-
tion shall be marked "amended," except as otherwise provided in this sec-
tion. The date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence sub-
mitted in support of the amendment shall be filed with or made a part of the
record. The department shall prescribe by rule the conditions under which
additions or minor corrections may be made to certificates or records within
one (1) year after the date of the event without the certificate being marked
"amended."
(2) (5) Upon receipt of a notarized voluntary acknowledgment of pater-
nity, the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show such
paternity if paternity is not already shown on the certificate of birth, and


change the child's surname to that of the father, if both parents so request.
Such certificate shall not be marked "amended."
(3) (6) Upon receipt of both a notarized affidavit of nonpaternity
signed by the husband attesting that he is not the father, and a notarized
acknowledgment of paternity signed by the mother and the alleged father
attesting that the alleged father is the father, the state registrar shall
amend the certificate of birth to show such paternity, and change the child's
name, if so requested by the mother and the alleged father. Such certificate
shall not be marked "amended."
(4) (7) Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a court of compe-
tent jurisdiction changing the name of a person born in this state and upon
request of such person or the parent(s), guardian, or legal representative,
the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show the new
name.
(5) (8) When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation re-
quired in the rules for amending a vital record in a manner otherwise per-
mitted by rule, or when the state registrar has reasonable cause to question
the validity or adequacy of the applicant's sworn statements or the documen-
tary evidence, and if the deficiencies are not corrected, the state regis-
trar shall not amend the vital record and shall advise the applicant of the
reason for this action and shall further advise the applicant of the right
to petition a court of competent jurisdiction for an order establishing the
facts necessary to make the requested amendment.
(6) (9) If an acknowledgment of paternity or affidavit of nonpaternity
is rescinded pursuant to section 7-1106, Idaho Code, and the certificate of
birth had been prepared or amended in accordance with the acknowledgment,
the state registrar shall not release any copies of the certificate of birth
except as required for a legal proceeding until a court order determining pa-
ternity has been provided to the state registrar. If the mother was married
at the time of either conception or birth, or between conception and birth,
the court shall also determine if the husband is the father of the child.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-278, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-278. PROCEDURE FOR DELAYED REGISTRATION OR AMENDMENT OF VITAL
RECORD. (1) Following exhaustion of any administrative procedures or reme-
dies provided by this chapter or by department rule, if an applicant has been
denied a request to amend a vital record as provided by section 39-250(5)(8),
Idaho Code, or because the item for which an amendment is sought has already
been once administratively denied, or if a delayed registration is rejected,
including as provided in section 39-267, Idaho Code, the applicant may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction of this state for an order estab-
lishing the facts necessary to establish or amend a vital record as provided
in this section.
(2) The petition must be verified and must allege at least:
(a) If the petition is for a delayed registration of birth:
(i) That the person for whom the delayed certificate is requested
was born in this state;
(ii) That the person's birth is not registered in another state or
country;


(iii) That a record for the person's birth cannot be found in the
state's vital records;
(iv) That despite diligent efforts the petitioner was unable to
obtain the information and evidentiary documents required for the
creation and registration of a delayed certificate of birth;
(v) That the state registrar has issued a final rejection of the
application for a delayed certificate of birth; and
(vi) The following information:
1. The original full name and sex of the registrant;
2. The date of birth and place of birth, including the:
(A) Facility;
(B) City, town or location;
(C) County; and
3. The full maiden name of the mother; and
4. The full name of the father, unless the registrant was
born out of wedlock.
(b) If the petition is for a delayed registration of death or still-
birth:
(i) That the person for whom the delayed certificate is requested
died in this state;
(ii) That the person's death is not registered in another state or
country;
(iii) That a record for the person's death cannot be found in the
state's vital records;
(iv) That despite diligent efforts the petitioner was unable to
obtain the information and evidentiary documents required for the
creation and registration of a delayed certificate of death;
(v) That the state registrar has issued a final rejection of the
application for a delayed certificate of death; and
(vi) The following information:
1. The full name and sex of the deceased;
2. The date and place of death, including the:
(A) Facility;
(B) City, town or location;
(C) County; and
3. For a stillbirth:
(A) The full maiden name of the mother; and
(B) The full name of the father, unless the mother was
not married.
(c) If the petition is for another amendment to a vital record, in a man-
ner otherwise permitted by department rule:
(i) The identity of the record registered with the state reg-
istrar and the item in the record the petitioner requests to be
amended;
(ii) The change requested and the purpose of the amendment;
(iii) The rule under which the amendment is otherwise permitted;
and
(iv) That the state registrar has issued a final rejection of the
application for the requested amendment and the reason for the re-
jection.


(3) The petitioner must attach all evidentiary documents presented to
the registrar and the written final letter of denial or rejection from the
registrar.
(4) The petitioner must provide a complete copy of the petition, to-
gether with notice of the date, time and place of the hearing, by mailing a
copy thereof at least fourteen (14) days before the time set for the hearing,
by certified, registered or ordinary first class mail, to the state regis-
trar at the address given in the written final letter of denial or rejection.
The state registrar or an authorized representative may appear and present
evidence at the hearing.
(5) If the court finds from the evidence presented that:
(a) The person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is requested was
born in this state, it shall make findings as to:
(i) The original full name and sex of the registrant;
(ii) The date of birth and place of birth, including the:
1. Facility;
2. City, town or location;
3. County; and
(iii) The full maiden name of the mother; and
(iv) The full name of the father, unless the registrant was born
out of wedlock.
(b) The person for whom a delayed certificate of death is requested died
in this state, it shall make findings as to:
(i) The full name and sex of the deceased; and
(ii) The date and place of death, including the:
1. Facility;
2. City, town or location; and
3. County.
(c) The person requesting any other amendment to a vital record in a
manner otherwise permitted by department rule has established the facts
necessary for the amendment and the amendment is otherwise appropri-
ate, it shall make an order amending the item in the vital record as
requested.
(6) The order of the court shall include a description of the evidence
presented and the date of the court's action.
(7) The order of the court shall not alter the fees otherwise required
by the registrar for the requested amendment, or the time frames otherwise
provided for the registrar to administratively establish or make the amend-
ment requested.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.